Nebraska, session 109, LB563.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB563 LB563
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 60-301, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-301 Sections 60-301 to 60-3,260 and sections 3 and 6 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Motor Vehicle Registration Act.
Sec. 2. Section 60-302, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-302 For purposes of the Motor Vehicle Registration Act, unless
the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections
60-302.01 to 60-360 and section 3 of this act shall be used.
Sec. 3. Commercial fertilizer trailer means a fertilizer trailer
that is owned by any individual or business entity that sells
agricultural fertilizer or agricultural chemicals as a going concern.
Sec. 4. Section 60-3,101, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,101 (1) License plates shall be issued every six years
beginning with the license plates issued in the year 2005.
(2) In the years in which plates are not issued, in lieu of issuing
such license plates, the department shall furnish to every person whose
motor vehicle or trailer is registered one or two validation decals, as
the case may be. Such validation decals shall bear the year for which
issued and be so constructed as to permit them to be permanently affixed
to the plates.
(3) This section shall not apply to license plates issued pursuant
to sections 60-3,203 and 60-3,228 and section 6 of this act.
Sec. 5. Section 60-3,104, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
60-3,104 The department shall issue the following types of license
plates:
(1) Amateur radio station license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,126;
(2) Apportionable vehicle license plates issued pursuant to section
-2-

LB563 LB563
2025 2025
60-3,203;
(3) Autocycle license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,100;
(4) Boat dealer license plates issued pursuant to section 60-379;
(5) Breast Cancer Awareness Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,230 and 60-3,231;
(6) Bus license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,144;
(7) Choose Life License Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,232
and 60-3,233;
(8) Commercial motor vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,147;
(9) Czech Heritage Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,259 and
60-3,260;
(10) Dealer or manufacturer license plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,114 and 60-3,115;
(11) Disabled veteran license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,124;
(12) Donate Life Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,245 and
60-3,246;
(13) Down Syndrome Awareness Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,247 and 60-3,248;
(14) Farm trailer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,151;
(15) Farm truck license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,146;
(16) Farm trucks with a gross weight of over sixteen tons license
plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,146;
(17) Fertilizer trailer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,151;
(18) Former military vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,236;
(19) Gold Star Family license plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,122.01 and 60-3,122.02;
-3-

LB563 LB563
2025 2025
(20) Handicapped or disabled person license plates issued pursuant
to section 60-3,113;
(21) Historical vehicle license plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,130 to 60-3,134;
(22) Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,258;
(23) Local truck license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,145;
(24) Metropolitan utilities district license plates issued pursuant
to section 60-3,228;
(25) Military Honor Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,122.03
and 60-3,122.04;
(26) Minitruck license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,100;
(27) Motor vehicle license plates for motor vehicles owned or
operated by the state, counties, municipalities, or school districts
issued pursuant to section 60-3,105;
(28) Motor vehicles exempt pursuant to section 60-3,107;
(29) Motorcycle license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,100;
(30) Mountain Lion Conservation Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,226 and 60-3,227;
(31) Native American Cultural Awareness and History Plates issued
pursuant to sections 60-3,234 and 60-3,235;
(32) Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,127 to 60-3,129;
(33) Nebraska History Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,255
and 60-3,256;
(34) Nebraska 150 Sesquicentennial Plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,223 to 60-3,225;
(35) Nonresident owner thirty-day license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-382;
(36) Passenger car having a seating capacity of ten persons or less
and not used for hire issued pursuant to section 60-3,143 other than
-4-

LB563 LB563
2025 2025
autocycles;
(37) Passenger car having a seating capacity of ten persons or less
and used for hire issued pursuant to section 60-3,143 other than
autocycles;
(38) Pearl Harbor license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,122;
(39) Permanent trailer license plates issued pursuant to section 6
of this act;
(40) (39) Personal-use dealer license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,116;
(41) (40) Personalized message license plates for motor vehicles,
trailers, and semitrailers, except motor vehicles, trailers, and
semitrailers registered under section 60-3,198, issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,118 to 60-3,121;
(42) (41) Pets for Vets Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,249
and 60-3,250;
(43) (42) Prisoner-of-war license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,123;
(44) (43) Prostate Cancer Awareness Plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,240;
(45) (44) Public power district license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,228;
(46) (45) Purple Heart license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,125;
(47) (46) Recreational vehicle license plates issued pursuant to
section 60-3,151;
(48) (47) Repossession license plates issued pursuant to section
60-375;
(49) (48) Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer
awareness issued pursuant to section 60-3,242;
(50) (49) Special interest motor vehicle license plates issued
-5-

LB563 LB563
2025 2025
pursuant to section 60-3,135.01;
(51) (50) Specialty license plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,104.01 and 60-3,104.02;
(52) (51) Support the Arts Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,251 and 60-3,252;
(53) (52) Support Our Troops Plates issued pursuant to sections
60-3,243 and 60-3,244;
(54) (53) The Good Life Is Outside Plates issued pursuant to
sections 60-3,253 and 60-3,254;
(55) (54) Trailer license plates issued for trailers owned or
operated by the state, counties, municipalities, or school districts
issued pursuant to section 60-3,106;
(56) (55) Trailer license plates issued for trailers owned or
operated by a metropolitan utilities district or public power district
pursuant to section 60-3,228;
(57) (56) Trailer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,100;
(58) (57) Trailers exempt pursuant to section 60-3,108;
(59) (58) Transporter license plates issued pursuant to section
60-378;
(60) (59) Trucks or combinations of trucks, truck-tractors, or
trailers which are not for hire and engaged in soil and water
conservation work and used for the purpose of transporting pipe and
equipment exclusively used by such contractors for soil and water
conservation construction license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,149;
(61) (60) Utility trailer license plates issued pursuant to section
60-3,151;
(62) (61) Well-boring apparatus and well-servicing equipment license
plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,109; and
(63) (62) Wildlife Conservation Plates issued pursuant to section
-6-

LB563 LB563
2025 2025
60-3,238.
Sec. 6. (1) Beginning January 1, 2026, a commercial fertilizer
trailer may be registered under this section in lieu of section 60-3,151.
(2) Upon application and payment of a fee of one dollar, the
department shall issue to the owner of any commercial fertilizer trailer
a permanent trailer license plate. Such application shall be made on a
form prescribed by the department.
(3) The department may deliver any such plate and the registration
certificate to the applicant by United States mail. The department may
charge a postage and handling fee in an amount not more than necessary to
recover the cost of postage and handling for the specific items mailed to
the registrant.
(4) Any license plate issued pursuant to this section shall remain
affixed to the rear of the commercial fertilizer trailer as long as such
trailer is registered under the Motor Vehicle Registration Act by the
owner making the original application pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section. Upon transfer of ownership of such trailer or at any time such
trailer is no longer registered pursuant to the Motor Vehicle
Registration Act, the license plate shall cease to be active and shall be
processed according to the rules and regulations adopted and promulgated
by the department.
(5) The renewal fee for each permanent trailer license plate shall
be one dollar and shall be assessed and collected in each license period
after the period in which the permanent license plate is initially
issued.
(6)(a) If a permanent trailer license plate is lost or destroyed,
the owner shall submit an affidavit to that effect to the department. A
replacement permanent license plate may be issued upon payment of a fee
of one dollar.
(b) If the registration certificate for any commercial fertilizer
trailer is lost or stolen, the department shall collect a fee of one
-7-

LB563 LB563
2025 2025
dollar for replacement of such certificate.
(7) If a commercial fertilizer trailer for which a permanent trailer
license plate has been issued pursuant to this section is no longer owned
by the registrant, the permanent trailer license plate shall be returned
to the department.
(8) The registrant shall be liable for the full amount of the
registration fee due for the commercial fertilizer trailer still owned
upon registration renewal.
Sec. 7. Original sections 60-301, 60-302, 60-3,101, and 60-3,104,
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-8-